Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement Benefits

47-2-90.
Rules and regulations with regard to credit for service; credit for service in the Georgia National Guard, Georgia State Guard, and General Assembly.

The board of trustees shall establish rules and regulations setting forth the amount of service in a year which is equivalent to one year of creditable service.

In no case shall more than one year of service be creditable for all service in one calendar year.

One year of creditable service shall be given for each year of service in the Georgia National Guard, Georgia State Guard, or the General Assembly, provided that no credit shall be given for such service unless the individual was a member of the retirement system at that time; provided, further, that no more than five years of creditable service may be so obtained.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 5; Ga. L. 1952, p. 175, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 10/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “, provided that creditable service performed as a member of the General Assembly shall be in addition to all other service” following “year” at the end of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Effect of transfer to state retired list for members of organized militia, §

38-2-9

.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-91.
Credit for accumulations of forfeited annual and sick leave.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Classified member” means a member of the retirement system who is in the classified service as defined in Code Section 45-20-2.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of administrative services provided for by Code Section 50-5-1.

“Compensatory time” means time off from work which is used in lieu of annual or sick leave to offset overtime service rendered by an employee when the employee is compensated by a fixed salary and is not financially compensated for such overtime service.

“Elected state official” means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, each member of the Public Service Commission, the Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Labor, Commissioner of Agriculture, each Justice of the Supreme Court, and each Judge of the Court of Appeals.

“Unclassified member” means any member of the retirement system who is in the unclassified service as defined in Code Section 45-20-2 or who is otherwise not covered by the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, including elected state officials.

Accumulated days of forfeited annual and sick leave for which a member has not been paid shall constitute creditable service if such member has at least six months of such forfeited leave at the time of the member’s retirement. The member shall be given one month of creditable service for each 20 days of forfeited annual and sick leave. Upon retirement of a classified member, the employer shall certify to the board of trustees the total amount of that member’s forfeited annual and sick leave based on leave records for periods of service where employers have maintained adequate leave records. For periods of service where no leave records are available for classified members, forfeited leave for an undocumented period may be computed as provided in subsection (i) of this Code section. The determination of accumulated days of forfeited annual and sick leave for unclassified members shall be based on leave records for periods of service where employers have maintained adequate leave records. For periods of service where no leave records are available, forfeited leave for unclassified employees shall be computed as follows:

When 15 years or more of leave records are available for an unclassified member, the determination of forfeited leave for undocumented periods shall be computed as provided in subsection (i) of this Code section; or

When less than 15 years of leave records are available for an unclassified member, the determination of forfeited leave for undocumented periods shall be based on the one-year average amount of forfeited annual and sick leave calculated by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section and as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, subject to the limitation in subsection (j) of this Code section.

For retirements that become effective prior to July 1, 2022, for both classified and unclassified members, each employer shall contribute the same amount as would have been contributed by the employer had the member obtaining creditable service for forfeited annual and sick leave remained in state employment without change in compensation for a period of time equal to the amount of forfeited annual and sick leave for which creditable service is obtained.

For unclassified members, the maximum number of days of annual and sick leave which may be accumulated in one year shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board governing employees in classified service, as defined in Code Section 45-20-2.

For the purposes of this Code section, compensatory time shall not be applicable to elected state officials and no elected state official may offset any annual or sick leave taken by any such official by any compensatory time which might otherwise be applicable to such official.

When accumulated forfeited annual and sick leave is claimed for the purposes of this Code section by an elected state official based on records maintained by or pursuant to the order or supervision of the elected state official, any such accumulated annual and sick leave accepted by the board of trustees shall, in addition to such records, be based on the elected state official’s sworn statement that the amount of accumulated forfeited annual and sick leave claimed by the elected state official is true and correct.

The commissioner shall select a random representative sample of employees who, as of June 30, 1985, have ten years or more of continuous service in the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2. From an examination of the personnel records of the members in the sample, the commissioner shall calculate an annual average of the number of days of annual leave taken and an annual average of the number of days of sick leave taken by the members in the sample. The average days for annual leave taken and the average days for sick leave taken shall then each be deducted, respectively, from the maximum number of days of annual leave and the maximum number of days of sick leave which may be accumulated in one year under rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board by an employee in the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2. The two figures resulting after making such reductions shall be added together and the resulting figure shall be forfeited annual and sick leave for each year of membership service for the purposes of subsection (g) of this Code section, subject to the limitation in subsection (j) of this Code section.

The average amount of forfeited annual and sick leave calculated by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section shall be supplied by that officer to all employers. When less than 15 years of leave records are available, the determination of forfeited annual and sick leave for unclassified employees with undocumented periods may be certified by the employer based on the average amount of forfeited annual and sick leave supplied by the commissioner. The amount which may be so certified shall be calculated by multiplying the figure representing the one-year average of forfeited annual and sick leave by the number of years of membership service for which leave records were not available at the time of retirement, subject to the limitation in subsection (j) of this Code section.

For any member whose membership service includes service as both a classified and unclassified member, both classified and unclassified service may be considered in qualifying for undocumented forfeited annual and sick leave calculations based on 15 or more years where employers have maintained adequate records of annual and sick leave taken by members. When 15 or more years of leave records are available through a combination of both classified and unclassified service, forfeited annual and sick leave for an undocumented period may be computed as provided in subsection (i) of this Code section. When less than 15 years of leave records are available through a combination of both classified and unclassified service for a member, then the undocumented forfeited leave for the unclassified service shall be calculated pursuant to subsection (g) of this Code section and undocumented forfeited leave for classified service shall be calculated pursuant to subsection (i) of this Code section, subject to the limitation in subsection (j) of this Code section. The two calculations shall then be added together to determine the total amount of forfeited leave for the undocumented period.

The formula provided by this subsection may be utilized for computation of forfeited annual and sick leave during the undocumented periods of service described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) and subparagraph (b)(1)(A) of this Code section. The formula is as follows:

Compute the maximum earnable sick and annual leave for the undocumented period;

Compute the total sick and annual leave taken for all periods in which documentation is available;

Compute the average sick and annual leave taken per month by dividing the answer under paragraph (2) of this subsection by the total number of documented months;

Multiply the answer under paragraph (3) of this subsection by the total number of months in the undocumented period; and

Subtract the answer under paragraph (4) of this subsection from the answer under paragraph (1) of this subsection to determine total leave earned and not taken during the undocumented period.

For unclassified employees who have less than 15 years of leave records available, the determination of forfeited annual and sick leave shall be limited to the lesser of the amount calculated pursuant to subsections (f) and (g) of this Code section or the average of actual forfeited annual and sick leave for which leave records are available, whichever is less.

The board of trustees may adopt rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Code section, to aid in administering and carrying out the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1451, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1022, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1624, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 6/HB 805; Ga. L. 2022, p. 392, § 1/SB 343.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(5) and in the first sentence of subsection (f).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “the State Personnel Administration” for “the state merit system” at the end of the third sentence of subsection (f).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “as defined in Code Section 45-20-2” for “of the State Personnel Administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(5); substituted “administrative services provided for by Code Section 50-5-1” for “personnel administration provided for in Code Section 45-20-4” in paragraph (a)(2); deleted “paragraph (2) of” following “defined in” in subsection (c); and substituted “as defined by Code Section 45-20-2” for “of the State Personnel Administration” in the first and third sentences of subsection (f).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “retirements that become effective prior to July 1, 2022, for” in paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-2-92.
Reestablishment of service credit after withdrawal of accumulated contributions from this retirement system or the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia; payments required to obtain credit.

Any present member who has withdrawn accumulated contributions from either the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, or both, may, after two years of service as a contributing member, reestablish the creditable service for which the member would have been eligible if the accumulated contributions had not been withdrawn, provided that the member repays into the retirement system an amount equal to the amount withdrawn, together with regular interest at the rate of 4 1/4 percent per annum from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment, which contributions and interest shall be placed in the participant’s individual account in the annuity savings fund. Upon receipt of notice from this retirement system to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia that a member has repaid to this retirement system contributions previously withdrawn from the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia shall pay an employer contribution plus regular interest into the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. The amount of the employer contribution shall be 6 percent of the reported compensation of the member during membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 547, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1407, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 900, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 453, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1544, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 16/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, near the end of the first sentence, inserted “contributions and” and substituted “participant’s individual account in the annuity savings fund” for “pension accumulation fund”.

47-2-93.
Credit for service rendered after December 31, 1953, by persons who were not members at the time; payments required to obtain credit.

Any other provisions of this law to the contrary notwithstanding, any member of this retirement system who received compensation from the state for services rendered by him after December 31, 1953, but who did not become a member until a later date, may receive credit for any service rendered after December 31, 1953, and before the date he became a member of this retirement system by paying the employee contributions that would have been paid by him if he had been a member during that time. No such credit shall be given except for full-time state employment. The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 93, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 96, § 2.

47-2-94.
Service credit provided for persons whose membership was terminated for failure to render at least one year of service in a five-year period.

Any current member whose membership has previously been terminated because that member rendered less than one year of service in a period of five consecutive years and who has never withdrawn the contributions he or she made during such previous membership shall receive credit, after one year of active service as a contributing member, for the creditable service accumulated under the previous membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 106, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 453, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 378, § 1.

47-2-95.
[Reserved] Credit for service during World War I, World War II, or the Korean Conflict; credit for service in the Georgia National Guard or the Georgia State Guard.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 11, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 5.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-96.
Prior service credit; payments required to obtain credit.

Any member of this retirement system who was previously an active member of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System and who has not withdrawn his or her employee contributions from such retirement system may elect to have all contributions made by or on behalf of such member transferred from such retirement system to this retirement system. Any such member shall notify the board of trustees of each retirement system.

Upon receipt of the notice provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System shall transfer to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of the employee, together with regular interest thereon. The member is authorized, but not required, to pay such additional amount to the board of trustees as the member desires.

If a member of this retirement system has withdrawn his or her employee contributions from the Georgia Judicial Retirement System, he or she may obtain creditable service in this retirement system as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section by paying to the board of trustees of this retirement system such amount as the member desires.

Upon receipt of the funds provided for in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, the board of trustees of this retirement system shall credit the member with only the number of years of creditable service, not to exceed the actual years of prior service, as the amount so transferred or paid shall warrant without creating any accrued liability as to this retirement system; provided, however, that no member shall be granted creditable service in excess of the service to which he or she was credited under the Georgia Judicial Retirement System.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-96

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 169, § 1/HB 477.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes.

The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 4; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 160, § 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 4; Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1020, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 143, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 158, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 237, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1015, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 93, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 360, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1233, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 521, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 337, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1506, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1246, § 2.

47-2-96.1.
[Repealed] Creditable service for temporary full-time employment by legislative branch.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-96.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 730, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1111, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 429, §§ 1, 2/HB 644; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 13, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-96.2.
[Repealed] Creditable service for uncredited full-time service with executive branch.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-96.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 174, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 14, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-97.
[Reserved] Applicability of creditable service under Code Section 47-2-93 or subsection (b) of Code Section 47-2-96 toward involuntary separation benefits; requirement as to full-time employment for credit.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 15, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 96, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 456, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-98.
Creditable service for member who was officer or employee of Georgia Housing and Finance Authority.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Authority” means the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority established by Chapter 26 of Title 50.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

Any member of this retirement system who became a member on or after July 1, 1995, and who, immediately prior to becoming a member, was an officer or employee of the authority shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees and subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for such prior service.

A member subject to this Code section shall have the option to transfer all or a portion of his or her vested interest in the pension plan maintained by the authority prior to the date he or she became a member of this retirement system to satisfy all or a portion of the cost to receive creditable service allowed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. Any funds transferred pursuant to such option shall be credited to the officer’s or employee’s annuity account established by the retirement system. The member shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement such amount so transferred. The member shall receive such creditable service as the combination of funds so transferred or paid would warrant without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system, up to the maximum amount of creditable service allowed by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-98

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 391, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 611, § 1/SB 161.

47-2-99.
Applicability of creditable service under Code Section 47-2-334 and Chapter 22 of this title; obtaining service and application for creditable service.

Any member of the retirement system, including a member subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334, who was, at any time prior to becoming a member, employed by an employer as a temporary full-time employee, may obtain up to 12 months of creditable service for such service as a temporary full-time employee under the conditions contained in this Code section; provided, however, to the extent that such employment was covered under Chapter 22 of this title, relating to the Georgia Defined Contribution Plan, the provisions of Code Section 47-2-101 shall apply.

Any person desiring to obtain the creditable service authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall make application in such manner as the board of trustees deems proper; tender to the board of trustees such proof of the prior employment as the board shall deem necessary; and pay to the board of trustees the employer and employee contributions as would have been paid if the member had been a member at the time of performing such prior service, together with regular interest thereon compounded annually to the date of payment.

Application for creditable service authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section must be received by the board of trustees not later than June 30, 2001, or 24 months after the member becomes a member of the retirement system, whichever date is later.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-99

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1239, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 51, § 1/SB 26.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in subsection (a), substituted “to the extent that such employment” for “that no such credit shall be granted for any period which” and added “, the provisions of Code Section 47-2-101 shall apply” at the end.

47-2-100.
Additional creditable service.

Any member of this retirement system may obtain up to an additional three years of creditable service as provided in this Code section. In order to obtain such additional creditable service, the member must:

Make application to the board of trustees in such manner as the board deems appropriate. Such application and payment must be made in conjunction with and simultaneously with the member’s application for retirement. If the application for retirement is withdrawn or denied, the application to purchase creditable service shall be void; and

Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service as provided in this Code section.

Upon receipt of an application for additional creditable service, the board of trustees shall certify to the applicant the amount of the payment required by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

No creditable service obtained pursuant to this Code section shall be used to calculate the amount of creditable service required to qualify for a benefit under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-110 or Code Section 47-2-122.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 574, § 1.

47-2-101.
Creditable
service
for prior service as member of Georgia Defined Contribution Plan.

A member who was a member of the Georgia Defined Contribution Plan created by Chapter 22 of this title immediately prior to becoming a member of this retirement system shall be entitled to obtain creditable service in this retirement system for all such prior service with such Georgia Defined Contribution Plan employer.

To obtain the creditable service established by subsection (a) of this Code section, a member shall:

Accrue at least five years of membership in this retirement system;

Apply to the board of trustees while a contributing member of the retirement system in a manner to be prescribed by the board of trustees;

Provide proof of such prior service as a Georgia Defined Contribution Plan member as the board of trustees deems necessary;

Authorize the transfer of all funds from his or her Georgia Defined Contribution Plan account related to the prior service for which creditable service is sought; and

Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service allowed by this Code section after accounting for any transfer under paragraph (4) of this subsection.

Following its approval of an application for creditable service pursuant to this Code section, the board of trustees shall certify to the applicant the amount of the payment to the retirement system required to earn creditable service allowed.

A member may make a one-time payment of the full amount established by the board of trustees under subsection (c) of this Code section within 90 days and thereafter receive such creditable service to which he or she is entitled or may elect to participate in a payment plan pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section.

A member may elect to make equal monthly payments to be deducted from such member’s earnable compensation over a period of 12, 24, 36, 48, 60, or 120 months to be paid according to a schedule established by the board of trustees, which amortizes the full actuarial cost of obtaining the creditable service, over the elected period of time based on the retirement system’s most recent valuation assumptions. Such schedule shall include a present accounting of the full amount necessary to complete the payments.

Once a member makes an election for an eligible period of time, he or she shall not be permitted to change such election.

At any time prior to retirement, a contributing member may make a one-time payment of the full amount necessary to complete the payments owed pursuant to the schedule established by the board of trustees pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Upon application for retirement, a member may make a one-time payment to the retirement system of the remaining amount owed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall be awarded such creditable service to which he or she is entitled.

Upon retirement, if a member has not paid an amount constituting the full actuarial cost as amortized, he or she shall only be awarded only as many months of creditable service on a whole month, pro rata basis as determined by the board of trustees from the original amortized payment schedule elected under paragraph (1) of this subsection as have been paid for in full.

Within 30 days of a member ceasing to be an employee for a reason other than death or retirement such individual shall make a one-time payment to the retirement system of the remaining amount necessary to complete the payments owed in accordance with the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and be awarded such creditable service to which he or she is entitled. If he or she does not make such payment, the board of trustees shall issue to such individual a refund of payments made pursuant to this subsection, and he or she shall forfeit the related creditable service; provided, however, that if the individual is a vested member of the retirement system, he or she shall be awarded such creditable service allowed pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection. Such individual may reapply for the creditable service sought if eligible and in accordance with this Code section.

Within 30 days of a member defaulting by failing to make his or her complete monthly payment in accordance with the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection such individual shall make a one-time payment to the retirement system of the remaining amount necessary to complete the payments owed in accordance with the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and be awarded such creditable service to which he or she is entitled. If he or she does not make such payment, the board of trustees shall issue to such individual a refund of payments made pursuant to this subsection, and he or she shall forfeit the related creditable service. Such individual may reapply for the creditable service sought if eligible and in accordance with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 51, § 2/SB 26.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2020.